Utah statutes.
4-24-11.   Certificate of brand inspection necessary to effectuate change of
ownership -- Exception.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the ownership of cattle, horses,
domesticated elk, or mules may not be transferred to any other person, through
sale or otherwise, without a certificate of brand inspection issued by a
department brand inspector.
(2) (a)  A brand inspection is not required to transfer ownership of dairy
calves from the farm of origin under 60 days of age.
(b)  Any person who transports dairy calves that have not been brand inspected
pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) shall be required to show a sales invoice upon
request.
